New Jersey, session 221, A4518.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  The Department of Human Services shall reimburse an owner or operator of a group home providing individual support services to a person with developmental disabilities residing at the group home at the full reimbursement rate for the provision of such services for a period of 60 days, if the person has been transferred to another facility for medical, psychiatric, or rehabilitative treatment services. If the person is not transferred back to the group home where the person resides within the 60 day period, the department shall reimburse the owner or operator of the group home at 50 percent of the reimbursement rate for the provision of individual support services to the person for an additional 120 day period. b.  If the person with developmental disabilities who has been transferred to another facility for treatment services pursuant to subsection a. of this section cannot return to the group home where the person resides within six months of the transfer, the owner or operator of the group home may begin the process to discharge the person from the group home pursuant to the provisions of N.J.A.C.10:44A-4.2. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.